Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.071

Abatement. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

The decedent's separate property and the property of the community composed of the decedent and the decedent's spouse or registered domestic partner abates for awards of family allowance under this chapter in accordance with chapter 11.10 RCW; provided however, that gifts containing a homestead or other nonfungible property that is exempt from attachment, execution, and forced sale shall abate to the extent that the property is awarded to a claimant under this chapter, regardless of whether the gift would be classified as intestate, residuary, general, demonstrative, or specific, except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.10.010(2).

[ 2024 c 20 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.